extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/nl.aff
FLAG long
SFX Nc N 2
SFX Nc rie erde rie
SFX Nc n rste n
 
# don't compound on case-different word borders
CHECKCOMPOUNDCASE

# no minimum chars for compounding (just don't flag the dangerous ones)
COMPOUNDMIN 0

# general compounding
COMPOUNDBEGIN Ca
COMPOUNDMIDDLE Cb
COMPOUNDEND Cc
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG Cp
ONLYINCOMPOUND Cx

# the following part might actually evolve to collision flags
# CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN /C1 /C2
# but this does not function yet with this kind of compounding

# /C1 = needs hyphen after a / klinkerbotsing met a
# /C2 = needs hyphen after e / klinkerbotsing met e
# /C3 = needs hyphen after i / klinkerbotsing met i
# /C4 = needs hyphen after o / klinkerbotsing met o
# /C5 = needs hyphen after u / klinkerbotsing met u

# FIRST CHAR OF WORD PARTS AND CORRESPONDING FLAGS
# a => /C1
# e => /C1C2C3C4
# i => /C1C2C3C4C5
# o => /C4
# u => /C1C2C3C4C5
# j => /C3

# pattern checks
CHECKCOMPOUNDDUP
# checkcompoundrep does not work as desired.
#CHECKCOMPOUNDREP

# unfortunately, checkcompoundpattern does not work correctly (2.08, 2.09) when compounding > 2 parts
# bug has been reported
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN 42
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN a /C1
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN e /C2
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN é /C2
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN i /C3
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN o /C4
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN u /C5
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN /Xf /Xf		# moeder-dochter etc
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN oon zor          	# woon-zorgflat (detectie werkt niet in 2.08)
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN armte krach	# warmte-krachtcentrale
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN aag dar		# maag-darmandoening
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN aagd ar          	# maag-darmandoening
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN hart long          # hart-longmachine
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN woon werk          # woon-werkverkeer
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN man vrouw		# man-vrouwverhouding
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN oofd hal		# hoofd hals
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN rts patiën		# arts-patiënt
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN aten koste		# baten-kosten
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN eroepskracht kin	# beroepskracht kind
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN oel midde		# doel middel
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN osis effec		# dosis effect
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN aat liefd		# haat liefde
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN uur verhuu		# huur verhuur
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN lant leverancie	# klant leverancier
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN waliteit prĳ	# kwaliteit prĳs
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN rĳs kwalitei	# prĳs kwaliteit
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN eidster kin	# leidster kind
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN isico rendemen	# risico rendement
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN ignaal rui		# signaal ruis
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN tudent docen	# student docent
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN tudent sta		# student staf
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN tudent compute	# student computer
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN raag aanbo		# vraag aanbod
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN erkgever werkneme	# werkgever werknemer
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN achelor maste	# bachelor master
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN k ker              # voorkomt bakkeren en zo
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN en loo             # voorkomt wolken+loos(t) en zo
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN en loze            # voorkomt wolken+loze(r) en zo
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN ios ko            	# voorkomt bios+koop
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN e ring             # voorkomt subsidie+ring
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN urger meeste	# burgemeester
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN uis vestin		# voorkomt huis+vesting+ waar het huisvesting+s+ moet zijn
CHECKCOMPOUNDPATTERN linden dar		# voorkomt blindendarm

# FLAG FOR FIRST WORDS THAT CAN BE FIRST PART OF COMPOUND AND HAVE AN S WHEN COMPOUNDED
# (unfortunately, I haven't found a method to suppress the affix s at the compound end
#  also, there is no method as far as I know to make affixes specific for a compound flag)

# accept an optional  - when compounding, first part
# the second line allows for the optional hyphen
SFX CA Y 2
SFX CA 0 /CaCp
SFX CA 0 -/CaCp

# accept an optional - when compounding, middle part
# the second line allows for the optional hyphen
SFX CB Y 2
SFX CB 0 /CbCp
SFX CB 0 -/CbCp

# for words that have a plural s and an s when compounding
# the second one allows for the optional hyphen
SFX Cd Y 2
SFX Cd 0 s/CaCbCcCp .  
SFX Cd 0 s-/CaCbCcCp .  

# for reasons of good results, parts that could have a compounding s
# but no plural s
# have to have separate (!) entries in the dictionary
# using the Ch flag 
SFX Ch Y 2
SFX Ch 0 s/CaCbCxCp .
SFX Ch 0 s-/CaCbCcCp .

# FLAG FOR WORDS THAT CAN BE FIRST PART AND COULD HAVE A HYPHEN BECAUSE OF SONANT COLLISIONS (END WITH A, E, I, O, U)
SFX Ce Y 2
SFX Ce 0 /CaCbCp .
SFX Ce 0 -/CaCbCcCp .

# FLAGS FOR LETTERWORDS AND WORD THAT NEED A HYPHEN WHEN COMPOUNDING
SFX Cl Y 1
SFX Cl 0 -/CaCbCp .

PFX Cw Y 1
PFX Cw 0 -/CbCcCp .

# FLAGS FOR NOUN DIMINITIVES 
# tuin=>tuintje
SFX Ya Y 3
SFX Ya 0 tje .
SFX Ya 0 tjes/CaCbCp . 
SFX Ya 0 tjes-/CaCbCp . 

# huis=>huisje
SFX Yb Y 6
SFX Yb 0 je [^m]
SFX Yb 0 jes/CaCbCp [^m] 
SFX Yb 0 jes-/CaCbCp [^m] 
SFX Yb 0 pje [m]
SFX Yb 0 pjes/CaCbCp [m]
SFX Yb 0 pjes-/CaCbCp [m]

# opleiding=>opleidinkje
SFX Yc Y 3
SFX Yc g kje .
SFX Yc g kjes/CaCbCp .
SFX Yc g kjes-/CaCbCp .

# ding=>dingetje
SFX Yd Y 3
SFX Yd 0 etje .
SFX Yd 0 etjes/CaCbCp .
SFX Yd 0 etjes-/CaCbCp .

# auto=>autootje
SFX Ye Y 15
SFX Ye 0 atje a
SFX Ye 0 utje u
SFX Ye 0 otje o
SFX Ye 0 etje i
SFX Ye é eetje é
SFX Ye 0 atjes/CaCbCp a
SFX Ye 0 atjes-/CaCbCp a
SFX Ye 0 utjes/CaCbCp u
SFX Ye 0 utjes-/CaCbCp u
SFX Ye 0 otjes/CaCbCp o
SFX Ye 0 otjes-/CaCbCp o
SFX Ye 0 etjes/CaCbCp i
SFX Ye 0 etjes-/CaCbCp i
SFX Ye é eetjes/CaCbCp é
SFX Ye é eetjes-/CaCbCp é

# bal=>balletje
SFX Yf Y 27
SFX Yf 0 betje b
SFX Yf 0 getje g
SFX Yf 0 ketje k
SFX Yf 0 letje l
SFX Yf 0 metje m
SFX Yf 0 netje n
SFX Yf 0 petje p
SFX Yf 0 retje r
SFX Yf 0 setje s
SFX Yf 0 betjes/CaCbCp b
SFX Yf 0 getjes/CaCbCp g
SFX Yf 0 ketjes/CaCbCp k
SFX Yf 0 letjes/CaCbCp l
SFX Yf 0 metjes/CaCbCp m
SFX Yf 0 netjes/CaCbCp n
SFX Yf 0 petjes/CaCbCp p
SFX Yf 0 retjes/CaCbCp r
SFX Yf 0 setjes/CaCbCp s
SFX Yf 0 betjes-/CaCbCp b
SFX Yf 0 getjes-/CaCbCp g
SFX Yf 0 ketjes-/CaCbCp k
SFX Yf 0 letjes-/CaCbCp l
SFX Yf 0 metjes-/CaCbCp m
SFX Yf 0 netjes-/CaCbCp n
SFX Yf 0 petjes-/CaCbCp p
SFX Yf 0 retjes-/CaCbCp r
SFX Yf 0 setjes-/CaCbCp s

# AOW=>AOW'tje
SFX Yg Y 2
SFX Yg 0 'tje .
SFX Yg 0 'tjes .

# FLAGS FOR PLURALS (COMPOUNDING END)
# team=>teams
SFX Za Y 1
SFX Za 0 s .

# ium => iums, ia, icus->ici
SFX Zu Y 4
SFX Zu 0 s ium
SFX Zu ium ia ium
SFX Zu icus ici icus
SFX Zu icus ica icus

# tuin=>tuinen
SFX Zb Y 4
SFX Zb 0 en/CaCbCp [^eo]
SFX Zb 0 ën/CaCbCp [eo]
SFX Zb 0 en-/CaCbCp [^eo]
SFX Zb 0 ën-/CaCbCp [eo]

# auto=>auto's, cd => cd's
SFX Zc Y 1
SFX Zc 0 's .

# schoonheid=>schoonheden
SFX Zd Y 2
SFX Zd heid heden/CaCbCp .
SFX Zd heid heden-/CaCbCp .

# tas=>tassen
SFX Ze Y 24
SFX Ze 0 ben/CaCbCp b
SFX Ze 0 den/CaCbCp d
SFX Ze 0 fen/CaCbCp f
SFX Ze 0 gen/CaCbCp g
SFX Ze 0 ken/CaCbCp k
SFX Ze 0 len/CaCbCp l
SFX Ze 0 men/CaCbCp m
SFX Ze 0 nen/CaCbCp n
SFX Ze 0 pen/CaCbCp p
SFX Ze 0 sen/CaCbCp s
SFX Ze 0 ren/CaCbCp r
SFX Ze 0 ten/CaCbCp t
SFX Ze 0 ben-/CaCbCp b
SFX Ze 0 den-/CaCbCp d
SFX Ze 0 fen-/CaCbCp f
SFX Ze 0 gen-/CaCbCp g
SFX Ze 0 ken-/CaCbCp k
SFX Ze 0 len-/CaCbCp l
SFX Ze 0 men-/CaCbCp m
SFX Ze 0 nen-/CaCbCp n
SFX Ze 0 pen-/CaCbCp p
SFX Ze 0 sen-/CaCbCp s
SFX Ze 0 ren-/CaCbCp r
SFX Ze 0 ten-/CaCbCp t

# baal=>balen
SFX Zf Y 88
SFX Zf al len/CaCbCp l
SFX Zf ar ren/CaCbCp r
SFX Zf an nen/CaCbCp n
SFX Zf ad den/CaCbCp d
SFX Zf ak ken/CaCbCp k
SFX Zf ap pen/CaCbCp p
SFX Zf as zen/CaCbCp s
SFX Zf af ven/CaCbCp f
SFX Zf am men/CaCbCp m
SFX Zf at ten/CaCbCp t
SFX Zf ag gen/CaCbCp g
SFX Zf el len/CaCbCp l
SFX Zf er ren/CaCbCp r
SFX Zf en nen/CaCbCp n
SFX Zf ed den/CaCbCp d
SFX Zf ek ken/CaCbCp k
SFX Zf ep pen/CaCbCp p
SFX Zf es zen/CaCbCp s
SFX Zf ef ven/CaCbCp f
SFX Zf em men/CaCbCp m
SFX Zf et ten/CaCbCp t
SFX Zf eg gen/CaCbCp g
SFX Zf ol len/CaCbCp l
SFX Zf or ren/CaCbCp r
SFX Zf on nen/CaCbCp n
SFX Zf od den/CaCbCp d
SFX Zf ok ken/CaCbCp k
SFX Zf op pen/CaCbCp p
SFX Zf os zen/CaCbCp s
SFX Zf of ven/CaCbCp f
SFX Zf om men/CaCbCp m
SFX Zf ot ten/CaCbCp t
SFX Zf og gen/CaCbCp g
SFX Zf ul len/CaCbCp l
SFX Zf ur ren/CaCbCp r
SFX Zf un nen/CaCbCp n
SFX Zf ud den/CaCbCp d
SFX Zf uk ken/CaCbCp k
SFX Zf up pen/CaCbCp p
SFX Zf us zen/CaCbCp s
SFX Zf uf ven/CaCbCp f
SFX Zf um men/CaCbCp m
SFX Zf ut ten/CaCbCp t
SFX Zf ug gen/CaCbCp g
SFX Zf al len-/CaCbCd l
SFX Zf ar ren-/CaCbCp r
SFX Zf an nen-/CaCbCp n
SFX Zf ad den-/CaCbCp d
SFX Zf ak ken-/CaCbCp k
SFX Zf ap pen-/CaCbCp p
SFX Zf as zen-/CaCbCp s
SFX Zf af ven-/CaCbCp f
SFX Zf am men-/CaCbCp m
SFX Zf at ten-/CaCbCp t
SFX Zf ag gen-/CaCbCp g
SFX Zf el len-/CaCbCp l
SFX Zf er ren-/CaCbCp r
SFX Zf en nen-/CaCbCp n
SFX Zf ed den-/CaCbCp d
SFX Zf ek ken-/CaCbCp k
SFX Zf ep pen-/CaCbCp p
SFX Zf es zen-/CaCbCp s
SFX Zf ef ven-/CaCbCp f
SFX Zf em men-/CaCbCp m
SFX Zf et ten-/CaCbCp t
SFX Zf eg gen-/CaCbCp g
SFX Zf ol len-/CaCbCp l
SFX Zf or ren-/CaCbCp r
SFX Zf on nen-/CaCbCp n
SFX Zf od den-/CaCbCp d
SFX Zf ok ken-/CaCbCp k
SFX Zf op pen-/CaCbCp p
SFX Zf os zen-/CaCbCp s
SFX Zf of ven-/CaCbCp f
SFX Zf om men-/CaCbCp m
SFX Zf ot ten-/CaCbCp t
SFX Zf og gen-/CaCbCp g
SFX Zf ul len-/CaCbCp l
SFX Zf ur ren-/CaCbCp r
SFX Zf un nen-/CaCbCp n
SFX Zf ud den-/CaCbCp d
SFX Zf uk ken-/CaCbCp k
SFX Zf up pen-/CaCbCp p
SFX Zf us zen-/CaCbCp s
SFX Zf uf ven-/CaCbCp f
SFX Zf um men-/CaCbCp m
SFX Zf ut ten-/CaCbCp t
SFX Zf ug gen-/CaCbCp g

# paragraaf => paragrafen
SFX Zg Y 2
SFX Zg af fen/CaCbCp .
SFX Zg af fen-/CaCbCp .

#lens=>lenzen
SFX Zh Y 4
SFX Zh s zen/CaCbCp s
SFX Zh f ven/CaCbCp f
SFX Zh s zen-/CaCbCp s
SFX Zh f ven-/CaCbCp f

# legende=>legenden (non-compounding)
SFX Zi Y 1
SFX Zi 0 n .

# dode=>doden (compounding)
SFX Zj Y 2
SFX Zj 0 n/CaCbCp .
SFX Zj 0 n-/CaCbCp .

# FLAGS FOR POSESSIVE FORM OF PROPER NAMES
SFX PN N 13
SFX PN 0 ' [hsxz]
SFX PN 0 's [^a][a]
SFX PN 0 s [a]a
SFX PN 0 's [^aeou][i]
SFX PN 0 's [^o][o]
SFX PN 0 's [^aeou][u]
SFX PN 0 s [bcdefghjklmnpqrtuüvwxzéëâïóçà]
SFX PN 0 s [oe]y
SFX PN 0 's [^eo]y
SFX PN 0 s [aeuo]i
SFX PN 0 's [bcdeéfghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz]a
SFX PN 0 's che
SFX PN 0 's dge

# FLAG for female inhabitant of place (Alphen=>Alphense)
SFX PI N 1
SFX PI 0 se .

# FLAG for male inhabitant of place (Eindhoven=>Eindhovenaar)
SFX PJ N 2
SFX PJ 0 aar en
SFX PJ 0 mer m

# FLAGS FOR VERBS

# flags for more or less common prefixes in verbs
PFX Pa Y 1
PFX Pa 0 aaneen .
PFX Pb Y 1
PFX Pb 0 aan .
PFX Pc Y 1
PFX Pc 0 achtereen .
PFX Pd Y 1
PFX Pd 0 achter .
PFX Pe Y 1
PFX Pe 0 achterna .
PFX Pf Y 1
PFX Pf 0 achterop .
PFX Pg Y 1
PFX Pg 0 achterover .
PFX Ph Y 1
PFX Ph 0 achteruit .
PFX Pi Y 1
PFX Pi 0 achterom .
PFX Pj Y 1
PFX Pj 0 af .
PFX Pk Y 1
PFX Pk 0 uiteen .
PFX Pl Y 1
PFX Pl 0 bĳ .
PFX Pm Y 1
PFX Pm 0 over .
PFX Pn Y 1
PFX Pn 0 voor .
PFX Po Y 1
PFX Po 0 binnen .
PFX Pp Y 1
PFX Pp 0 door .
PFX Pq Y 1
PFX Pq 0 dicht .
PFX Pr Y 1
PFX Pr 0 mee .
PFX Ps Y 1
PFX Ps 0 uit .
PFX Pt Y 1
PFX Pt 0 na .


# 3d person, add a t to the stem
SFX V3 Y 1
SFX V3 0 t .

# past tense, add de or den to the stem
SFX Vp Y 2
SFX Vp 0 de .
SFX Vp 0 den .

# past tense, add te or ten to the stem
SFX Vq Y 2
SFX Vq 0 te .
SFX Vq 0 ten .

# verb +d, +de
SFX Vi Y 2
SFX Vi 0 d .
SFX Vi 0 de .

# aangetekend => aangetekende
SFX Ve Y 1
SFX Ve 0 e .

# FLAGS FOR ADJECTIVES
# viezig => viezige, moe => moeë
SFX Aa Y 2
SFX Aa 0 e [^e]
SFX Aa 0 ë [e]

# lelijk => lelijker, raar => raarder
SFX Ab Y 2
SFX Ab 0 er [^r]
SFX Ab 0 der r

# lelijk => lelijkere, dor => dordere
SFX Ac Y 2
SFX Ac 0 ere [^r]
SFX Ac 0 dere r

# lelijk => lelijkst
SFX Ad Y 2
SFX Ad 0 st [^s]
SFX Ad 0 t [s]

# lelijk => lelijkste
SFX Ae Y 2
SFX Ae 0 ste [^s]
SFX Ae 0 te [s]

# lelijk => lelijks
SFX Ai Y 1
SFX Ai 0 s .
